sl-SI: Vrsta morske hrane: Inčun; Baramundi; Brancin; Kalamari; Krap; Som; Školjka; Trska; Rakovica; Rak; Sipa; Jegulja; Iverka; Kirnja; Vahnja; Morska plošča; Sled; Jastog; Skuša; Mahi-mahi; Dagnja; Hobotnica; Ostriga; Ostriž; Ščuka; Polak; Losos; Sardina; Pokrovače; Kozica; Hlastač; Morski list; Lignji; Mečarica; Tilapija; Postrv; Tuna; Drugo
es: Tipo de marisco: Anchoa; Barramundi; Bajo; Calamar; Carpa; Bagre; Almeja; Bacalao; Cangrejo; Cangrejo de río; Calamar; Anguila; Platija; Mero; Abadejo; Fletán; Arenque; Langosta; Caballa; Mahi-mahi; Mejillón; Pulpo; Ostra; Perca; Lucio; Abadejo; Salmón; Sardina; Vieira; Camarón; Pargo; Lenguado; Calamar; Pez espada; Tilapia; Trucha; Atún; Otros
ru: Тип морепродуктов: Анчоус; Баррамунди; Окунь; Кальмар; Карп; Сом; Моллюск; Треска; Краб; Рак; Каракатица; Угорь; Камбала; Групер; Пикша; Палтус; Сельдь; Омар; Скумбрия; Махи-махи; Мидия; Осьминог; Устрица; Окунь; Щука; Минтай; Лосось; Сардина; Гребешок; Креветка; Луциан; Морской язык; Кальмар; Рыба-меч; Тилапия; Форель; Тунец; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta plodova mora: Inćun; Baramundi; Grgeč; Lignja; Šaran; Som; Kućica; Bakalar; Rak; Riječni rak; Sipa; Jegulja; Iverak; Kirnja; Bakalarka; Halibut; Haringa; Jastog; Skuša; Lampuga; Dagnja; Hobotnica; Kamenica; Smuđ; Štuka; Aljaška kolja; Losos; Sardina; Jakobova kapica; Škamp; Pagar; List; Lignja; Sabljarka; Tilapija; Pastrva; Tuna; Ostalo
el: Τύπος θαλασσινών: Γαύρος; Γιγαντόπερκα; Μπάσο; Καλαμάρι; Κυπρίνος; Γατόψαρο; Αχιβάδα; Μπακαλιάρος; Καβούρι; Καραβίδα; Σουπιά; Χέλι; Καλκάνι; Σφυρίδα; Εγκλεφίνος; Ιππόγλωσσα; Ρέγγα; Αστακός; Σκουμπρί; Μάχι μάχι; Μύδι; Χταπόδι; Στρείδι; Πέρκα; Λούτσος; Μπακαλιάρος της Αλάσκας; Σολομός; Σαρδέλλα; Χτένι; Γαρίδα; Λουτιάνος; Γλώσσα; Καλαμάρι; Ξιφίας; Τιλάπια; Πέστροφα; Τόνος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip fructe de mare: Anșoa; Barramundi; Bas; Calamari; Crap; Somn; Scoici; Cod; Crab; Langustă; Sepie; Ţipar; Cambulă; Pește din familia Epinephelinae; Eglefin; Halibut; Hering; Homar; Macrou; Mahi-mahi; Midii; Caracatiță; Stridie; Biban; Știucă; Cod negru; Somon; Sardine; Escalop; Crevetă; Snapper; Limbă de mare; Calamar; Pește-spadă; Tilapia; Păstrăv; Ton; Altele
sv: Typ av skaldjur: Ansjovis; Barramundi; Havsabborre; Bläckfisk; Karp; Havskatt; Mussla; Torsk; Krabba; Kräftor; Bläckfisk; Ål; Flundra; Epinephelinae; Kolja; Hälleflundra; Sill; Hummer; Makrill; Mahi-mahi; Mussla; Bläckfisk; Ostron; Abborre; Gädda; Pollock; Lax; Sardin; Kammussla; Räka; Snapper; Sjötunga; Bläckfisk; Svärdfisk; Tilapia; Forell; Tonfisk; Annat
sk-SK: Druh morských plodov: Ančovičky; Okúň; Ostriež; Kalmár; Kapor; Sumec; Mušľa; Treska škvrnitá; Krab; Raky; Sépia; Úhor; Platesa; Epinephelinae; Treska jednoškvrnná; Halibut; Sleď; Homár; Makrela; Koryféna; Slávka; Chobotnica; Ustrica; Ostriež; Šťuka; Pollachius; Losos; Sardinka; Hrebenatka; Krevety; Chňapal; Solea; Kalmary; Mečúň; Tilapia; Pstruh; Tuniak; Iné
ko: 해산물 종류: 멸치; 바라문디; 베이스; 오징어; 잉어; 메기; 대합; 대구; 게; 가재; 갑오징어; 뱀장어; 가자미; 그루퍼; 해덕; 넙치; 청어; 랍스터; 고등어; 만새기; 홍합; 문어; 굴; 퍼치; 강꼬치고기; 대구류; 연어; 정어리; 스캘럽; 새우; 도미; 서대; 오징어; 황새치; 틸라피아; 송어; 참치; 기타
da: Type af fisk og skaldyr: Ansjos; Barramundi; Bas; Calamari; Karpe; Havkat; Musling; Torsk; Krabbe; Languster; Blæksprutte; Ål; Skrubbe; Epinephelinae; Kuller; Helleflynder; Sild; Hummer; Makrel; Mahi-mahi; Musling; Blæksprutte; Østers; Aborre; Gedde; Sej; Laks; Sardin; Kammusling; Reje; Snapper; Fladfisk; Blæksprutte; Sværdfisk; Tilapia; Ørred; Tun; Andet
cs: Druh mořských ryb a plodů: Sardel; Barramundi; Basa; Kalamáry; Kapr; Sumec; Škeble; Treska; Krab; Langusta; Sépie; Úhoř; Platýs; Kanic; Treska skvrnitá; Halibut; Sleď; Humr; Makrela; Zlak nachový (mahi-mahi); Slávka; Chobotnice; Ústřice; Okoun; Štika; Treska polak; Losos; Sardinka; Hřebenatka; Krevety; Chňapal červený; Mořský jazyk; Oliheň; Mečoun; Tilapie; Pstruh; Tuňák; Jiné
ja: 魚介類の種類: アンチョビ; バラマンディ; ベース; カラマリ; 鯉; ナマズ; ハマグリ; タラ; カニ; ザリガニ; イカ; うなぎ; ヒラメ; ハタ; ハドック; オヒョウ; ニシン; ロブスター; サバ; マヒマヒ; ムール貝; タコ; カキ; パーチ; パイク; スケトウダラ; サーモン; イワシ; ホタテ; エビ; 鯛; カレイ; イカ; メカジキ; ティラピア; マス; マグロ; その他
zh-CN: 海鲜类型: 凤尾鱼; 尖吻鲈; 低音; 鱿鱼; 鲤鱼; 鲶鱼; 蛤蜊; 鳕鱼; 螃蟹; 小龙虾; 墨鱼; 鳗鱼; 比目鱼; 石斑鱼; 黑线鳕; 大比目鱼; 鲱鱼; 龙虾; 鲭鱼; 海豚; 贻贝; 章鱼; 牡蛎; 河鲈; 梭子鱼; 狭鳕鱼; 三文鱼; 沙丁鱼; 扇贝; 虾; 鲷鱼; 鳎鱼; 枪乌贼; 剑鱼; 罗非鱼; 鳟鱼; 金枪鱼; 其他
it: Tipo di prodotto ittico: Acciuga; Barramundi; Basso; Calamaro; Carpa; Pesce gatto; Vongola; Merluzzo; Granchio; Gambero turco; Seppia; Anguilla; Platessa; Cernia; Eglefino; Halibut; Aringa; Aragosta; Sgombro; Mahi-mahi; Cozza; Polpo; Ostrica; Persico; Luccio; Merluzzo nero; Salmone; Sardina; Smerlatura; Gamberetto; Dentice; Sogliola; Totano; Pesce spada; Tilapia; Trota; Tonno; Altro
fi: Merenelävätyyppi: Anjovis; Barramundi; Basso; Mustekala; Karppi; Monni; Simpukka; Turska; Rapu; Ravut; Seepia; Ankerias; Kampela; Meriahven; Kolja; Ruijanpallas; Silli; Hummeri; Makrilli; Mahi-mahi; simpukka; Mustekala; Osteri; Ahven; Hauki; Seiti; Lohi; Sardiini; Kampasimpukka; Katkarapu; Napsija; Meriantura; Kalmari; Miekkakala; Tilapia; Taimen; Tonnikala; Muu
en: Seafood type: Anchovy; Barramundi; Bass; Calamari; Carp; Catfish; Clam; Cod; Crab; Crawfish; Cuttlefish; Eel; Flounder; Grouper; Haddock; Halibut; Herring; Lobster; Mackerel; Mahi-mahi; Mussel; Octopus; Oyster; Perch; Pike; Pollock; Salmon; Sardine; Scallop; Shrimp; Snapper; Sole; Squid; Swordfish; Tilapia; Trout; Tuna; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de frutos do mar: Anchovas; Barramundi; Baixo; Calamari; Carpa; Peixe-gato; Molusco; Bacalhau; Caranguejo; Lagostim; Choco; Enguia; Linguado; Garoupa; Hadoque; Halibute; Arenque; Lagosta; Cavalinha; Dourado-do-mar; Mexilhão; Polvo; Ostra; Perca; Lucio; Polaca; Salmão; Sardinha; Vieira; Camarão; Pargo; Linguado; Lula; Peixe-espada; Tilápia; Truta; Atum; Outro
hu: „Tenger gyümölcsei” termék típusa: Szardella; Barramundi; Pisztrángsügér; Calamari; Ponty; Harcsa; Kagyló; Tőkehal; Rák; Folyami rák; Tintahal; Angolna; Lepényhal; Fűrészes sügér; Foltos tőkehal; Laposhal; Hering; Homár; Makréla; Mahi-mahi; Éti kagyló; Polip; Osztriga; Sügér; Csuka; Sárga tőkehal; Lazac; Szardínia; Kagyló; Garnélarák; Csattogóhal; Nyelvhal; Tintahal; Kardhal; Tilapia; Pisztráng; Tonhal; Egyéb
pl: Typ owoców morza: Sardela; Barramundi; Bas; Kalmary; Karpie; Zębacz; Małże; Dorsz; Krab; Langusta; Mątwa; Węgorz; Stornia; Granik; Łupacz; Halibut; Śledź; Homar; Makrela; Koryfena; Omułek jadalny; Ośmiornica; Ostryga; Okoń; Szczupak; Mintaj; Łosoś; Sardynka; Przegrzebek; Krewetki; Lucjan; Sola; Kałamarnica; Włócznik; Tilapia; Pstrąg; Tuńczyk; Pozostałe
zh-TW: 海鮮類型: 鯷魚; 尖吻鱸; 貝斯; 魷魚; 鯉魚; 鯰魚; 蛤; 鱈魚; 螃蟹; 小龍蝦; 烏賊; 鰻魚; 比目魚; 石斑魚; 黑線鱈; 大比目魚; 鯡魚; 龍蝦; 鯖魚; 鬼頭刀; 蚌; 章魚; 牡蠣; 河鱸; 梭鱸魚; 狹鱈; 鮭魚; 沙丁魚; 扇貝; 蝦; 鯛魚; 鰈目魚; 烏賊; 旗魚; 羅非魚; 鱒魚; 鮪魚; 其他
tr: Deniz Ürünleri Türü: Hamsi; Barramundi; Bas; Kalamar; Sazan; Yayın balığı; Deniz tarağı; Morina; Yengeç; Kerevides; Mürekkepbalığı; Yılanbalığı; Pisi balığı; Orfoz; Mezgit balığı; Trança balığı; Ringa; Istakoz; Orkinos; Mahi-mahi; Midye; Ahtapot; İstiridye; Tatlısu levreği; Turna balığı; Kömür balığı; Somon; Sardalya; Tarak kabuğu; Karides; Lapina; Dil balığı; Kalamar; Kılıçbalığı; Tilapia; Alabalık; Ton balığı; Diğer
nl: Zeevruchttype: Ansjovis; Barramundi; Bas; Calamari; Karper; Meerval; Tweekleppig schelpdier; Kabeljauw; Krab; Langoest; Inktvis; Aal; Bot; Tandbaars; Schelvis; Heilbot; Haring; Kreeft; Makreel; Mahi-mahi; Mossel; Octopus; Oester; Baars; Snoek; Koolvis; Zalm; Sardine; Sint-jakobsschelp; Garnaal; Snapper; Tong; Inktvis; Zwaardvis; Tilapia; Forel; Tonijn; Andere
bg-BG: Тип морски дарове: Аншоа; Барамунди; Лаврак; Калмари; Шаран; Сом; Миди; Треска; Рак; Раци; Сепия; Змиорка; Камбала; Групер; Пикша; Халибут; Херинга; Омар; Скумрия; Махи-махи; Мида; Октопод; Стриди; Костур; Щука; Сайда; Сьомга; Сардина; Мидички; Скариди; Снапер; Морски език; Калмар; Риба меч; Тилапия; Пъстърва; Риба тон; Други
lt-LT: Jūros gėrybių rūšis: Ančiuviai; Baramundis; Vilkžuvė; Kalmarai; Karpis; Šamas; Moliuskas; Menkė; Krabas; Vėžys; Sepija; Ungurys; Plekšnė; Jūrinis ešerys; Juodadėmė menkė; Paltusas; Silkė; Omaras; Skumbrė; Didžioji korifena; Midijos; Aštuonkojis; Austrė; Ešerys; Lydeka; Saida; Lašiša; Sardinė; Šukutės; Krevetės; Rifų ešerys; Jūrų liežuvis; Kalmaras; Kardžuvė; Tilapija; Upėtakis; Tunai; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de peixe/marisco: Anchovas; Perca-gigante; Baixo; Calamari; Carpa; Peixe-gato; Amêijoa; Bacalhau; Caranguejo; Lagostim; Choco; Enguia; Linguado; Garoupa; Hadoque; Halibute; Arenque; Lagosta; Cavala; Mahi-mahi; Mexilhão; Polvo; Ostra; Perca; Lúcio; Escamudo; Salmão; Sardinha; Vieira; Camarão; Pargo; Solha; Lula; Peixe-espada; Tilápia; Truta; Atum; Outro
vi: Loại hải sản: Cá cơm; Cá chẽm; Đàn bass; Mực ống; Cá chép; Cá da trơn; Con trai; Cá tuyết; Cua; Tôm hùm đất; Mực nang; Lươn; Cá bơn; Cá mú; Cá tuyết chấm đen; Cá bơn Nauy; Cá trích; Tôm hùm; Cá thu; Cá dũa tươi; Con hến; Bạch tuộc; Con hàu; Cá rô; Cá chó; Cá minh thái; Cá hồi; Cá mòi; Sò điệp; Tôm; Cá hồng; Cá lưỡi trâu; Mực; Cá kiếm; Cá rô phi; Cá hồi chấm; Cá ngừ; Khác
fr: Type de fruit de mer: Anchois; Barramundi; Basse; Calamar; Carpe; Poisson-chat; Palourde; Morue; Crabe; Écrevisse; Seiche; Anguille; Patauger; Groupeur; Églefin; Flétan; Hareng; Homard; Maquereau; Mahi-mahi; Moule; Poulpe; Huître; Perche; Brochet; Goberge; Saumon; Sardine; Pétoncle; Crevette; Vivaneau; Sole; Calmar; Espadon; Tilapia; Truite; Thon; Autre
de: Fisch- und Meeresfrüchteart: Anchovis; Barramundi; Bass; Calamari; Karpfen; Wels; Muschel; Kabeljau; Krabben und Krebse; Flusskrebse; Sepien; Aal; Flunder; Zackenbarsch; Schellfisch; Heilbutt; Hering; Hummer; Makrele; Mahi-mahi; Muschel; Oktopus; Auster; Echter Barsch; Hecht; Seelachs; Lachs; Sardine; Jakobsmuschel; Garnele; Schnapper; Seezunge; Kalmar; Schwertfisch; Tilapia; Forelle; Thunfisch; Sonstiges
nb: Type sjømat: Ansjos; Barramundi; Bass; Calamari; Karpe; Malle; Musling; Torsk; Krabbe; Kreps; Blekksprut; Ål; Flyndre; Havabbor; Hyse; Kveite; Sild; Hummer; Makrell; Mahi-mahi; Musling; Blekksprut; Østers; Abbor; Gjedde; Sei; Laks; Sardin; Kamskjell; Reke; Snapper; Piggvar; Akkar; Sverdfisk; Tilapia; Ørret; Tunfisk; Annen
th: ประเภทอาหารทะเล: ปลาแอนโชวี่; ปลากะพงขาว; เบส; หมึกคาลามารี่; ปลาคาร์ป; ปลาดุก; หอยกาบ; ปลาค็อด; ปู; กุ้งเครย์ฟิช; หมึกกระดอง; ปลาไหล; ปลาลิ้นหมา; ปลากะรัง; ปลาแฮดด็อก; ปลาตาเดียว; ปลาแฮร์ริ่ง; ล็อบสเตอร์; ปลาแมกเคอเรล; ปลาอีโต้มอญ; หอยแมลงภู่; หมึกยักษ์; หอยนางรม; ปลาเพิร์ช; ปลาไพค์; ปลาพอลล็อค; ปลาแซลมอน; ปลาซาร์ดีน; หอยเชลล์; กุ้ง; ปลากะพงแดง; ปลาโซล; หมึกกล้วย; ปลากระโทงดาบ; ปลานิล; ปลาเทราต์; ปลาทูน่า; อื่นๆ